North Carolina, session 2025, HB969.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Legislative Research Commission (LRC) shall study the abolition
of contributory negligence in this State. As part of the study, the LRC shall do all of the following:
(1) Determine whether the abolition of contributory negligence would improve
measure outcomes for the citizens of this State.
(2) Determine whether maintaining contributory negligence is harming citizens,
and in what primary ways.
(3) Evaluate the fiscal impacts of the adoption of a new negligence framework,
including costs to individuals, consumers, businesses, insurance, and other
appropriate areas.
(4) Make a recommendation as to what negligence framework would be most
beneficial to the State, including modified and pure comparative negligence.
SECTION 2. The LRC shall submit a report on its study, including any legislative
recommendations, to the 2026 Regular Session of the 2025 General Assembly upon its
convening.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H969-v-1*